Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3520
Preexisting rights; intent of sections.

The provisions of sections 23-3520 to 23-3525 are not intended to limit any preexisting rights to charge and collect for services rendered prior to the passage of sections 23-3520 to 23-3525 had by hospitals which are created and existing under the general powers of counties of this state or under the provisions of sections 23-3501 to 23-3519 and 23-3528 to 23-3572.

Laws 1971, LB 908, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.68.